New Jersey, session 222, A1583.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, each school district shall incorporate instruction on water safety into the health education curriculum for students in grades K through 12 as part of the districts implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards for Comprehensive Health and Physical Education. b.    The instruction shall provide students with information on: (1)   the proper use of flotation devices; (2)   how to become aware of water conditions; (3)   the danger of rip currents and how to respond if caught in one; and (4)   the importance of swimming in areas monitored by a lifeguard. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.